Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 21
EGGS

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 9 of chapter 7, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1965, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1965, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

PART 1 EGG-LAYING HENS

PART 2 CONFINEMENT OF EGG-LAYING HENS